Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1995.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 404(e)(2)(v) and (vi) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 404. Rate and Amount of Compensation.--* * *(e) * * *(2) * * *(v) If, on July 1, [2025] 2027, the trigger percentage 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 determined under section 301.7(a) is less than two hundred fifty per centum (250%), the following shall apply:(A) Notwithstanding the definition of "highest quarterly wages" in subsection (b), but subject to subclause (vi), "highest quarterly wages" for purposes of this section for calendar years [2026] 2028 and thereafter shall be the average of the total wages (computed to the nearest dollar), which were paid to the employe computed as follows:(I) The wages paid to the employe in that calendar quarter in which such total wages were highest during the base year shall be calculated.(II) The amount calculated under division (I) shall be added to an amount equal to one hundred thirty per centum (130%) of the wages paid to the employe in the calendar quarter in which such total wages were the second highest of any calendar quarter during the base year, provided that the amount added under this division (II) may not be greater than the wages paid to the employe during the highest calendar quarter under division (I).(III) The sum calculated under division (II) shall be divided by two.(B) Notwithstanding section 401(a)(2), and except as provided in subsections (a)(3) and (e)(1) and (2), section 401(a) shall require that the second entry in Part A of the table for the determination of rate and amount of benefits, on the line on which there appears the employe's weekly benefit rate, does not exceed sixty-three per centum (63%) of the employe's total base year wages.(vi) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) and subclause (v) if, on July 1, [2026] 2028, or July 1 of any subsequent year, the trigger percentage determined under section 20250HB1995PN2516 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 301.7(a) is at least two hundred fifty per centum (250%), the following shall apply:(A) "Highest quarterly wages" for the subsequent calendar year and thereafter shall be determined as provided in subsection (b) and not as provided in subclause (v).(B) Section 401(a)(2) shall apply and not subclause (v)(B).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1995PN2516 - 3 - 12345678